District of Columbia statutes.
2-1226.32

Definitions.

For the purposes of this part, the term:

(1)

“Applicant” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 6-1451.01(2).

(1A)

“Complete stormwater management plan” means a plan, with required supporting documentation, that demonstrates compliance with each applicable stormwater management requirement, as determined by DDOE.

(1B)

“Current edition” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 6-1451.01(8A).

(1C)

“DDOE” means the District Department of the Environment.

(1D)

“District-financed” or “District instrumentality-financed” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 6-1451.01(10A).

(1E)

“First building permit” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 6-1451.01(14A).

(2)

“Green Building Act” means the Chapter 14A of Title 6.

(3)

“LEED” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 6-1451.01(26).

(3A)

“LEED standard for commercial and institutional buildings” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 6-1451.01(31A).

(4)

“New construction” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 6-1451.01(33).

(5)

“Project” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 6-1451.01(35).

(6)

Repealed.

(7)

“Substantial improvement” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 6-1451.01(40).

Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 452, 55 DCR 1689
Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-349, § 4(a), 58 DCR 724
Oct. 23, 2012, D.C. Law 19-192, § 2(b), 59 DCR 10174
D.C. Law 18-349 added subsecs. (a)(1A) and (3A); and rewrote subsec. (a)(3), which formerly read as follows: “(3) ‘LEED’, ‘LEED-CI’, ‘LEED-CS’, and ‘LEED-NC’ shall have the same meanings as set forth in § 6-1451.01(26), (27), (28), and (30).”
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-192 redesignated (1A) as (1B); added (1A), (1C), (1D), and (1E); and repealed (6).